California statutes. Insurance Code
(4) Establishing limitations on the use of the aircraft.

(5) Any person licensed under Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401) of the Agricultural Code with respect to his operation of an aircraft for the purpose of applying pest control materials or substances by dusting, spraying or any other manner whereby such materials or substances are applied through the medium of aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

11585.

(a) No policy of insurance for residential property located within California shall be issued or delivered, and no existing policy of insurance for residential property located within California shall be renewed, unless the policy complies with the requirements of subdivision (b).

(b) If the policy includes any liability insurance, or if a liability insurance policy is issued in connection with the policy, the policy shall cover liability incurred by the insured in connection with the use of the residential property for a polling place for any state or local election, under the same terms and conditions as for other liability covered by the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 815, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11586.

(a) On and after the effective date of this section, each insurer licensed to issue automobile liability insurance or common carrier liability insurance, and selling or offering for sale automobile liability insurance or common carrier liability insurance to a transit district organized under Part 3 (commencing with Section 30000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code, shall, as a condition of obtaining or retaining a license to transact business in this state, offer uninsured motorist coverage identical in all respects to that set forth in Section 11580.2 with regard to private passenger motor vehicles, except that the insurer and such transit district, as the case may be, may not agree to waive such coverage.

(b) No insurer subject to subdivision (a) shall refuse to issue uninsured motorist coverage to any such transit district which applies to it therefor.

(c) Each insurer subject to this section may charge such premium rate for providing uninsured motorist coverage to such transit district as will be sufficient for it to meet the costs of providing such coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

11588.

No insurer authorized to do business in this state and to provide professional liability insurance to persons lawfully engaged in the practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine, health plans, and to partnerships or corporations lawfully engaged in the operation of hospitals, sanitariums, clinics, or other health care facilities, shall refuse to issue or renew insurance at rates which are not excessive or unfairly discriminatory as defined in Section 1852 to those persons, partnerships or corporations, solely on the grounds that those persons, partnerships or corporations have entered, or intend to enter, into valid written agreements with patients or prospective patients for the arbitration of cases or controversies arising out of the professional or business relationships between those persons, partnerships or corporations and said patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 226, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11589.

No insurer who provides professional liability insurance for physicians and surgeons or dentists shall increase the premium for such insurance, impose a surcharge with respect to such insurance, or otherwise require additional compensation for such insurance, or institute or increase a deductible amount payable by the insured, because a notice of intention to commence an action has been given pursuant to Section 364 of the Code of Civil Procedure, unless a complaint has been served on the physician and surgeon or dentist with respect to such action.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “professional liability insurance” means insurance against liability for damages caused by any act or omission of a physician and surgeon or dentist in rendering professional services within this state issued by any insurer, including, but not limited to, a joint underwriting association, cooperative corporation or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------

11589.1.

(a) (1) An insurer shall not refuse to issue or renew, nor shall terminate, professional liability insurance for a health care provider in this state, solely based on any prohibited bases for discrimination set forth in subdivision (d).

(2) With respect to policies issued in this state and that provide professional liability coverage for damages arising from services offered or performed in multiple states, if a health care provider offers or performs the services described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) in a
 state where those services are unlawful, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an insurer from terminating, or refusing to issue or renew, a health care provider’s professional liability coverage in that state where the unlawful services are offered or performed.

(b) An insurer shall not increase premium, impose a surcharge or other additional compensation or cost, or institute or increase a deductible amount or other cost sharing payable by an insured, solely based on any prohibited bases for discrimination set forth in subdivision (d). Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede, modify, or otherwise affect in any way the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1 and implementing regulations, as applicable.

(c) An insurer providing professional liability insurance for health care providers in this state shall not deny coverage for liability for damages arising from offering or performing abortion, contraception, gender-affirming health care, or care related to those health care services, if those services are within the scope of the insured’s
 license, the services are lawful in the state where they are offered or performed, and the policy would otherwise cover liability for such damages arising from performing or rendering other professional services within the insured’s scope of license. 

(d) For purposes of this section, “prohibited bases for discrimination” include all of the following:

(1) A health care provider offers or performs abortion, contraception, gender-affirming health care, or care related to those health care services, that are lawful in this state, including, but not limited to, those that may be unlawful in another state.

(2) Another state’s laws create potential or actual liability for abortion,
 contraception, gender-affirming health care, or care related to those health care services offered or performed in this state.

(3) Legal or administrative action taken in another state against a health care provider concerning abortion, contraception, gender-affirming health care, or care related to those health care services, results or resulted in a judgment, conviction, or disciplinary action against the provider, if those health care services, as provided, are or would be lawful and consistent with the applicable standard of care in this state.

(e) This section applies to professional liability insurance marketed,
 offered, issued, amended, or renewed in this state for health care providers in this state.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Health care provider” means a person licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code to perform or render health care services in this state.

(2) “Offer or perform” means to offer, perform, provide, prescribe, dispense, furnish, or otherwise render health care items or services, as well as to aid or assist in the rendering of those items or services.

(3) “Professional liability insurance” means insurance against liability for damages caused
 by any act or omission of a person licensed to provide health care services in rendering professional services within this state issued by any insurer, including, but not limited to, a joint underwriting association, cooperative corporation, or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   (AB 571)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11589.5.

No insurer who provides professional liability insurance for persons licensed under the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code shall exclude from coverage under that policy liability arising from the breach of the duty of the licensee arising under Article 2 (commencing with Section 2079) of Chapter 3 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an insurer may exclude coverage against liability arising out of a dishonest, fraudulent, criminal, or malicious act, error, or omission committed by, at the direction of, or with the knowledge of the insured.

For the purposes of this section, “professional liability insurance” means insurance against liability for damages caused by any act or omission of a real estate licensee in rendering professional services in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Personal Liability Insurance Providing Workers’ Compensation Coverage for Household Employees [11590. - 11593.]

11590.

Except as provided in Section 11591, no policy providing comprehensive personal liability insurance may be issued or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1977, unless it contains a provision for coverage against liability for the payment of compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code, to any person defined as an employee by subdivision (d) of Section 3351 of the Labor Code. Any such policy in effect on or after January 1, 1977, whether or not actually containing such provisions, shall be construed as if such provisions were embodied therein. However, such coverage shall not apply if any other existing, valid and collectible, workers’ compensation insurance for such liability is applicable to the injury or death of such employee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11591.

The requirements of Section 11590 shall be inapplicable to any such policy of insurance or endorsement where the services of such employee are in connection with the trade, business, profession, or occupation, as such terms are defined in Sections 3355 and 3356 of the Labor Code, of the insured.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11592.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 1851, the rates, classifications, and rating systems for the workers’ compensation insurance covering those persons defined as employees by subdivision (d) of Section 3351 of the Labor Code, and the insurers issuing such insurance coverage, shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11593.

The premium charge for the coverage required by Section 11590 shall not be separately stated from that charged for other coverage under the policy in the insured’s copy of the following: premium notice, policy, endorsement or memorandum of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Capital Requirements of Reserve Basis Insurers [11600. - 11602.]

11600.

An incorporated insurer issuing policies of liability, workers’ compensation, or common carrier liability insurance, shall be governed by the paid-in capital and surplus requirements of Sections 700.01 to 700.05, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 275.)
-------------------------------------------

11601.

Except as restricted by its charter, such an incorporated insurer, having such a paid-in capital, may transact all three of such insurances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

11602.

Any such insurer which on July 26, 1919, was authorized by its charter to transact liability insurance may transact workers’ compensation and common carrier liability insurance as though expressly permitted by its charter to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 276.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assigned Risk Plans [11620. - 11627.]

11620.

(a) The commissioner, after a public hearing, shall approve or issue a reasonable plan for the equitable apportionment, among insurers admitted to transact liability insurance, of those applicants for automobile bodily injury and property damage liability insurance who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure that insurance through ordinary methods. The commissioner shall require the payment of one thousand four hundred ten dollars ($1,410), in advance, as a fee for the filing of amendments to the plan with the commissioner. The commissioner may approve or issue reasonable amendments to the plan that are approved by the plan’s advisory committee, if he or she first holds a public hearing to determine whether the amendments are in keeping with the intent and purpose of this section. All those insurers shall
 subscribe to the plan and its amendments and participate in the plan.

(b) Judicial review of a change to the plan, including rate revision proceedings, shall be in accordance with Section 1858.6.

(c) The adoption of the plan referenced in subdivision (a), and any amendments thereto, is not subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), unless written or oral comments submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) raise regulatory standards set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 11349 of the Government Code.

(d) The commissioner shall provide notice of any hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) by doing all of the following at least 45 days prior to the hearing:

(1) Publishing the notice in the California Regulatory Notice Register.

(2) Mailing the notice to the parties on the department’s regulations mailing list.

(3) Posting the notice on the department’s public Internet Web site.

(e) Interested parties may present written or oral comments at the hearing, or may submit written comments to the contact person identified in the hearing notice by the date and time posted in the notice. Before adopting any amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall consider all comments received on or before the day of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 69.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11621.1.

In the event an insurer discontinues writing automobile liability insurance in this state but retains its license to write that business, it shall continue to pay plan assessments and receive plan assignments until its quota or quotas established by its writings prior to discontinuance of business has or have been filled. However, if the automobile liability business of an insurer discontinuing the writing of that business in this state has been transferred to or reinsured by another insurer, the latter shall receive and assume the plan assignments and plan
 assessments of the insurer discontinuing business, as established by its writings prior to the transfer or agreement of reinsurance, until its quota or quotas has or have been filled, unless another insurer is allowed to assume those obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 175, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11621.2.

(a) An insurer that is no longer licensed to write automobile liability insurance in this state shall have its plan business treated in the same manner as its voluntary business and shall not receive new assignments.

(b) The runoff of existing plan business shall be conducted in an orderly manner with policies nonrenewed upon the next anniversary date.

(c) An insurer that elects to surrender its license or has
 its license to do business in this state revoked shall comply with the following requirements:

(1) If an insurer elects to leave this state by surrendering its license to write automobile insurance, it shall submit to the plan’s advisory committee as a condition precedent to the surrender of its license, a plan that disposes of the insurer’s quota of plan assignments established by its voluntary writings, and provides for the handling of its outstanding assigned risk policies, including payment of claims, by appropriate financial arrangements or reinsurance agreements. The plan’s advisory committee shall evaluate the plan that is submitted and shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends acceptance or rejection by the commissioner of the plan.

(2) In the event an insurer’s license to do business in this state is revoked by the commissioner, the insurer shall
 submit to the plan’s advisory committee a plan that disposes of the insurer’s quota of plan assignments established by its voluntary writings, and provides for the handling of its outstanding assigned risk policies, including payment of claims, by appropriate financial arrangements or reinsurance agreements. The plan’s advisory committee shall evaluate the plan that is submitted and shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends acceptance or rejection by the commissioner of the plan.

(d) If all insurers in a group are under the same ownership and management, or a group elects to be treated as a single insurer and an insurer in the same group is no longer licensed, that insurer shall comply with the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11621.3.

Insurer groups under the same ownership may elect to be treated as one insurer for purposes of participating in the plan and receiving its assignments and assessments pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 175, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11621.4.

(a) New plan assignments to a participating insurer may be suspended or a participating insurer may be relieved of its obligation to renew existing assigned risk policies at expiration when a valid order of suspension is issued by the commissioner and the suspension of assignments or policy renewals is approved by the commissioner. Prior to the approval of a suspension of assignments or policy renewals, the plan’s advisory committee shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends approval or denial of the suspension.

(b) If an insurer granted relief pursuant to subdivision (a) resumes writing business in this state, its quota shall reflect the plan assignments it would have received and the assigned risk renewal policies it would have issued during its period of suspension. The required assignment adjustment shall be spread over a period of three or more years, as determined by the commissioner. Prior to determining this assignment adjustment, the plan’s advisory committee shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends approval or denial of the adjustment.

(c) The adjustment of the insurer’s quota shall be a percentage of the insurer’s under-assignments as determined by the commissioner. Prior to determining this adjustment, the plans’s advisory committee shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends approval or denial of the adjustment. After the approved
 period of adjustment has expired, the insurer’s normal quota will resume unless the insurer shows good cause to and receives approval from the commissioner for extension of the adjustment period. Prior to this approval, the plan’s advisory committee shall advise the commissioner as to whether or not it recommends approval or denial of this extension.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 175, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11621.5.

(a) In the event proceedings have been initiated by the commissioner to have an insurer declared insolvent, and a receiver or liquidator has been appointed, the plan shall reimburse any insured of that insurer for the unearned premium on any assigned risk policy then in force, upon submission of satisfactory evidence from the insured that the policy was in force at the time of the declaration of insolvency and that the requisite premium had been paid.

(b) The amount expended by
 the plan to remit unearned premium to insureds shall be deemed a cost of administration of the plan and shall be apportioned as provided in the plan adopted and approved pursuant to this article. The plan shall be subrogated in the liquidation proceedings to the right of reimbursement of all insureds to whom unearned premium has been remitted. In the event that the insurer is subsequently found by the court not to be insolvent, the proceedings are dismissed, and the receiver or liquidator has been discharged, the insurer shall be assessed by the plan for the total amount expended by the plan for return of unearned premiums.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 175, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11622.

(a) A plan shall require the issuance of a policy affording coverage in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, each person as a result of any one accident and, subject to
 that limit as to one person, the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, all persons as a result of any one accident, and the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident, or in those minimum amounts as are necessary to provide exemption from the security requirements of Section 16021 of the Vehicle Code or for which proof of ability to respond in damages or adequate protection against liability is otherwise required by law, but shall not require the issuance of a policy
 affording coverage in excess of those amounts.

(b) For a policy or bond issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, a plan shall require the issuance of a policy affording coverage in the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, each person as a result of any one accident and, subject to that limit as to one person, the amount of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, all persons as a result of any one accident, and the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident, or in those minimum amounts as are necessary to provide exemption from
 the security requirements of Section 16021 of the Vehicle Code or for which proof of ability to respond in damages or adequate protection against liability is otherwise required by law, but shall not require the issuance of a policy affording coverage in excess of those amounts.

(c) For a policy or bond issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2035, a plan shall require the issuance of a policy affording coverage in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, each person as a result of any one accident and, subject to that limit as to one person, the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, all persons as a result of any one accident, and the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident, or in those minimum amounts as are necessary to provide exemption from the security requirements of Section
 16021 of the Vehicle Code or for which proof of ability to respond in damages or adequate protection against liability is otherwise required by law, but shall not require the issuance of a policy affording coverage in excess of those amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 15.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11622.5.

The plan shall provide for effective dates for coverage consistent with all of the following:

(a) Except as provided in this section, in no event shall coverage be effective prior to the date and time of execution of the application forms. Postage meter or United States Postal Service postmarks shall not be recognized by the plan as establishing effective
 dates.

(b) (1) When the applicant requires that coverage be effective immediately, the effective date and time shall be established using an electronic effective date procedure established by the plan. The plan shall establish a future effective date using the electronic effective date procedure. The future effective date option shall be available upon request by an applicant. An applicant may request a future effective date of 45 days or less from the date of application completion.

(2) The manager of the plan shall ensure access at no cost to the user as part of the electronic effective date procedure. The manager shall maintain sufficient capacity to service, in a timely manner, applications received by means of the electronic effective date procedure.

(3) The electronic effective date
 procedure shall be available only to producers of record who are certified by the plan and shall include a procedure to prevent fraudulent applications.

(4) A producer of record shall have a duty to comply with the requirements of this section within 24 hours of the date and time the application is completed and executed.

(c) Coverage for vehicles shall become effective at the date and time the application is transmitted through the plan’s electronic effective date procedure if and only if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The producer of record and the applicant certify under penalty of perjury on the application the date and time that the application forms were completed and executed.

(2) The producer of record uses the electronic
 effective date procedure adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The application forms and required deposit are submitted to the plan manager no later than two working days following the date the application forms are completed and executed. The submission date is established in accordance with the procedure established by the plan.

(d) If the application is made without using the electronic effective date procedure or if there is not compliance with the provisions of subdivision (c), coverage shall be effective in accordance with an alternative procedure established by the plan, but not later than 12:01 a.m. on the date following receipt of the application in the plan office unless a later date is requested.

(e) If the applicant desires coverage on a date later than that which would otherwise be fixed pursuant to
 this section, the applicant shall indicate that date and the plan manager shall fix the effective date of coverage as of 12:01 a.m. on the desired date of coverage. However, no date shall be later than 45 days after the date of application.

(f) The effective date for coverage for an additional vehicle to be added to an in-force policy or for other coverage to be added to an in-force policy shall not be subject to the requirements of this section, but shall be governed by the terms of the policy and other applicable laws and regulations.

(g) In order to provide evidence of a requested effective date, the plan shall establish a procedure for the maintenance of appropriate records of all risks for which the producer of record has designated the time and date of coverage.

(h) Where the plan’s electronic effective date
 procedure is disrupted due to failure of transmission or receiving equipment due to fire, earthquake, explosion, civil unrest, or similar disaster or emergency, the producer of record may bind coverage up to one day prior to the time the application forms and required deposit are mailed to the plan manager, as established by the United States Postal Service postmark on the envelope in which the application was enclosed.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, where the producer of record discovers a material error in an application, the producer of record shall be authorized to rescind coverage bound for a period up to 24 hours after the date and time established pursuant to the plan’s electronic effective date procedure.

(j) To ensure compliance with the electronic effective date procedure, application forms shall contain the following statement in 12-point
 boldface type:

IMPORTANT NOTICETHIS POLICY IS NOT EFFECTIVE UNTIL YOUR APPLICATION IS ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITTED TO THE PLAN BY YOUR AGENT OR BROKER. THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS MUST ALSO BE MET:
(1) BOTH YOU AND YOUR AGENT OR BROKER MUST SIGN AND DATE A PROPERLY COMPLETED APPLICATION.
(2) YOUR AGENT OR BROKER MUST TRANSMIT YOUR APPLICATION TO THE PLAN WITHIN TWO DAYS OF ITS COMPLETION.
YOU MAY REQUEST THAT YOUR AGENT OR BROKER TRANSMIT THE DOCUMENTS IN YOUR PRESENCE TO ENSURE IMMEDIATE COVERAGE, PROVIDED THE ABOVE REQUIREMENTS ARE MET.
IF THE ABOVE REQUIREMENTS ARE NOT MET, THE EFFECTIVE
 DATE OF YOUR COVERAGE MAY BE DELAYED.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.   (AB 1597)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11623.

(a) (1) To assist the commissioner in carrying out the purposes of this article, an advisory committee composed of 15 members is created. The commissioner shall administer and operate the plan as authorized by law. The commissioner shall consult with the advisory committee on a regular basis on policy matters affecting the operation of the plan.

(2) Eight members representing subscribing insurers shall be elected annually by subscribing insurers. The commissioner shall appoint the noninsurer members. Four members shall represent the public. Two members shall represent producers. The remaining member is the commissioner or his or her designee.

 (3) Each insurer representative serving shall be either (A) a salaried employee or officer of the named insurer or (B) a salaried employee or officer of another insurer from a group of insurance companies under the same management as the named insurer. A salaried employee or officer of the holding company of the named insurer may also be designated as the representative. At least two insurer representatives shall be employed by insurers having their principal headquarters located in California. At least two insurer representatives shall represent companies who have average annual
 automobile liability premiums in California below one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in the prior three years. At least one insurer representative shall represent an insurer with average annual automobile liability premiums in California exceeding one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in the prior three years. At least one insurer representative shall represent an insurer with average annual automobile liability premiums in California exceeding seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) in the prior three years.

(4) Public members shall be paid two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per meeting and shall be reimbursed all reasonable expenses incurred.

(5) The commissioner shall remove members for nonattendance. Unless satisfactory excuse is made in writing to the commissioner in a timely manner, nonattendance shall mean the failure to appear at more than two regularly
 scheduled meetings in a 12-month period. Should the member who is removed represent a company or agency, another representative from the company or agency may not be appointed for a period of not less than two years.

(6) The advisory committee with the approval of the commissioner shall appoint a manager to carry out the purposes of this article, employ sufficient personnel to provide services necessary to the operation of the plan, and contract for the provision of statistical and actuarial services.

(7) The cost of the plan, including any personnel and contracting costs, shall be fairly apportioned among the subscribing insurers to whom assignments may be made. The costs associated shall be directly attributable to the management of the plan and directly related to its programs. In consultation with the advisory committee, the commissioner shall develop, issue, and adopt
 regulations to carry out the purposes of this article.

(b) Notwithstanding this act, which changes the status of the governing committee to that of an advisory committee, the committee shall have the right to retain counsel of its choice pursuant to a selection process adopted by the committee and the right and necessary standing to bring and defend actions in judicial and administrative proceedings related to the plan in the name of the plan, with all powers attendant thereto including the right to retain consultants, counsel, and expert witnesses of its choice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 55.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11623.5.

(a) Groups of insurers not under common ownership or management may form a limited assignment distribution arrangement. Each arrangement shall have one servicing carrier that writes assigned risk business on behalf of the members of the arrangement in return for consideration from the other participating carriers for not writing the business.

(b) No insurer may act as a servicing carrier except with the continuing approval of the commissioner.

(c) Each servicing carrier shall have a surplus of at least ten
 million dollars ($10,000,000).

(d) Upon the approval of the commissioner of a servicing carrier under this section, the plan shall make all assignments that otherwise would be made to a participant to the servicing carrier for that participant.

(e) The commissioner shall impose a filing fee for the filing necessary to obtain approval pursuant to this section, which fee shall be limited to that sufficient to defray the costs of the department in connection with considering the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.

The plan shall contain:

(a) Standards for determining eligibility of applicants for insurance, including a requirement of a certificate of eligibility as provided in Section 11624.08, and in establishing those standards the following may be taken into consideration in respect to the applicant or any other person who may reasonably be expected to operate the applicant’s automobile with his or her permission:

(1) His or her criminal
 conviction record.

(2) His or her record of suspension or revocation of a license to operate an automobile.

(3) His or her automobile accident records.

(4) His or her age and mental, physical and moral characteristics which pertain to his or her ability to safely and lawfully operate an automobile.

(5) The condition or use of the automobile.

(b) Procedures for making application for insurance, for apportionment of eligible applicants among the subscribing insurers and for appeal to the commissioner by persons who believe themselves aggrieved by the operation of the plan.

(c) A provision that the organization administering the
 plan shall notify the Department of Insurance regarding the name of each applicant for insurance who is rejected by the assigned risk plan and the statutory grounds for the rejection. The information contained in that notification shall be for the confidential use of the Department of Insurance.

(d) Rules and regulations governing the administration and operation of the plan.

(e) Provisions showing the basis upon which premium charges shall be made, and the manner of payment thereof. Premium charges for the plan shall not be excessive, inadequate, nor unfairly discriminatory, and shall be actuarially sound so as to result in no subsidy of the plan. In no event shall the commissioner be required to approve a plan rate that includes a provision for operating profits greater than zero dollars. The commissioner shall not be required to allow a contingency provision with respect to a
 plan rate if the commissioner takes final action on an application for a rate change within 180 days from the date the application is submitted to the commissioner by the plan’s advisory committee. The plan shall include procedures for notifying within a reasonable time the agent, broker, or solicitor who obtained insurance under the plan for the insured of any nonpayment of premium to the insurer when notice of the nonpayment is sent to the insured pursuant to Section 662.

(f) Any other provisions as may be necessary to carry out the purpose of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1133, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.08.

The plan shall require a certificate of eligibility to accompany the application for coverage. The certificate shall indicate whether or not the applicant meets the criteria for the purchase of a good driver discount policy as set forth in Section 1861.025 and, if so, the name of the insurer and the insurer’s representative that denied the applicant automobile insurance coverage.

The fact that an applicant has specified in the certificate of eligibility a particular insurer as having denied automobile insurance coverage
 shall not, by itself, be sufficient to sustain a finding in a formal action brought by the commissioner under Section 1858.1 that the specified insurer in fact denied the applicant automobile insurance coverage in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1861.02. The certificate shall be signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury to verify its accuracy, and shall only be required with applications for personal lines automobile insurance through the plan. The agent or broker shall also be required to sign the certificate of eligibility indicating that he or she has reviewed the certificate for completeness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.09.

Upon a determination by the plan that a certificate of eligibility is defective due to an omission or mistake which is immaterial to determining the eligibility of the applicant for coverage, the plan shall immediately provide written notice of the defect or defects to the insured and to the agent or broker of record. The notice shall inform the applicant that he or she has 10 days from the postmark date of the notice to correct the defect and postmark the correction or missing information for return to the plan.

In the
 event that the defect is not corrected within that 10-day time period, the policy is void from inception. Providing a photocopy of the application or certificate denoting the specific defect or defects shall be adequate to comply with the requirement to specify the defects in the certificate.
